Washington statutes.
RCW 18.290.030

Construction.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) An individual who holds a credential issued by this state, other than as a genetic counselor, to engage in the practice of that occupation or profession without obtaining an additional credential from the state. The individual may not use the title genetic counselor unless licensed as such in this state;

(2) The practice of genetic counseling by a person who is employed by the government of the United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States;

(3) The practice of genetic counseling by a person who is a regular student in an educational program approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor; or

(4) The practice of genetic counseling by a person who is practicing under the general supervision of a genetic counselor in a genetic counseling training site while gathering logbook cases for the purpose of meeting licensing requirements.

[ 2009 c 302 s 3.]